Delaware, session 153, HB381.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Chapter 12B, Subtitle II, Title 6 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 12B-101. Definitions. For purposes of this chapter: (5) âNoticeâ means any of the following: a. Written notice. b. Telephonic notice. c. Electronic notice, if the notice provided is consistent with the provisions regarding electronic records and signatures set forth in Â§ 7001 of Title 15 of the United States Code or if the personâs primary means of communication with the resident is by electronic means. d. Substitute notice, if the person required to provide notice under this chapter demonstrates that the cost of providing notice will exceed $75,000, or that the affected number of Delaware residents to be notified exceeds 100,000 residents, or that the person does not have sufficient contact information to provide notice. Substitute notice consists of all of the following: 1. Electronic notice if the person has email addresses for the members of the affected class of Delaware residents. 2. Conspicuous posting of the notice on a website page of the person if the person maintains 1 or more website pages. 3. Notice to major statewide media, including newspapers, radio, and television and publication on the major social media platforms of the person providing notice. 4. Notice of the breach of security to the Attorney General. Â§ 12B-102. Disclosure of breach of security; notice. (c) Notice required by subsection (a) of this section must be made without unreasonable delay but not later than 60 days after determination of the breach of security, except in the following situations: (1) A shorter time is required under federal law. (2) A law-enforcement agency determines that the notice will impede a criminal investigation and such law-enforcement agency has made a request of the person that the notice be delayed. Any such delayed notice must be made after such law-enforcement agency determines that notice will not compromise the criminal investigation and so notifies the person of such determination. (3) When a person otherwise required by subsection (a) of this section to provide notice, could not, through reasonable diligence, identify within 60 days that the personal information of certain residents of this State was included in a breach of security, such person must provide the notice required by subsection (a) of this section to such residents as soon as practicable after the determination that the breach of security included the personal information of such residents, and must provide notice of the breach of security to the Attorney General within 60 days after the determination of the breach of security, unless such person provides or has provided substitute notice in accordance with Â§ 12B-101(5)d. of this title. title within 60 days after the determination of the breach of security. Â§ 12B-103. Procedures deemed in compliance with security breach notice requirements. (b) Under this chapter, a person that is regulated by state or federal law, including the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (P.L. 104-191, as amended) and the Gramm Leach Bliley Act (15 U.S.C. Â§ 6801 et seq., as amended) and that maintains procedures for a breach of security pursuant to the laws, rules, regulations, guidance, or guidelines established by its primary or functional state or federal regulator is deemed to be in compliance with this chapter Â§ 12B-102(c) of this title if the person notifies affected Delaware residents in accordance with the maintained procedures when a breach of security occurs.